Utah statutes.
53A-11-906.   Alternatives to suspension or expulsion.

(1)  Each local school board or governing board of a charter school shall establish:

(a)  policies providing that prior to suspending or expelling a student for repeated acts of willful disobedience, defiance of authority, or disruptive behavior which are not of such a violent or extreme nature that immediate removal is required, good faith efforts shall be made to implement a remedial discipline plan that would allow the student to remain in school; and

(b)  alternatives to suspension, including policies that allow a student to remain in school under an in-school suspension program or under a program allowing the parent or guardian, with the consent of the student's teacher or teachers, to attend class with the student for a period of time specified by a designated school official.

(2)  If the parent or guardian does not agree or fails to attend class with the student, the student shall be suspended in accordance with the conduct and discipline policies of the district or the school.

(3)   The parent or guardian of a suspended student and the designated school official may enlist the cooperation of the Division of Child and Family Services, the juvenile court, or other appropriate state agencies, if necessary, in dealing with the student's suspension.

(4)  The state superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with school districts and charter schools, shall:

(a)  research methods of motivating and providing incentives to students that:

(i)  directly and regularly reward or recognize appropriate behavior;

(ii)  impose immediate and direct consequences on students who fail to comply with district or school standards of conduct; and

(iii)  keep the students in school, or otherwise continue student learning with appropriate supervision or accountability;

(b)  explore funding resources to implement methods of motivating and providing incentives to students that meet the criteria specified in Subsection (4)(a);

(c)  evaluate the benefits and costs of methods of motivating and providing incentives to students that meet the criteria specified in Subsection (4)(a);

(d)  publish a report that incorporates the research findings, provides model plans with suggested resource pools, and makes recommendations for local school boards and school personnel;

(e)  submit the report described in Subsection (4)(d) to the Education Interim Committee; and

(f)  maintain data for purposes of accountability, later reporting, and future analysis.



Amended by Chapter 82, 2007 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 161, 2007 General Session

